District of Columbia statutes.
38-104

Exemption from personal liability and security or bond requirement.

The members of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia shall not be personally liable in damages for any official action of the Board performed in good faith in which the members participate; nor shall any member of the Board be liable for any costs that may be taxed against them or the Board on account of any such official action by them as members of the Board; but such costs shall be charged to the District of Columbia and paid as other costs are paid in suits brought against the municipality; nor shall the said Board or any of its members be required to give any supersedeas bond or security for costs or damages on any appeal whatever.

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 316, ch. 3446, § 2(i)
Jan. 26, 1929, 45 Stat. 1139, ch. 105
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 102, Pub. L. 90-292, § 3(b)
1981 Ed., § 31-105.
1973 Ed., § 31-104a.